Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1570.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Jack E. and Sheldon L. Chambers Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Jack E. Chambers was born June 19, 1924, in Altoona.(2) Jack E. Chambers was the son of Harry and Edna Chambers and had two brothers, Harry and Thomas, and two sisters, Irene and Joyce.(3) Jack E. Chambers enlisted in the United States Marines Corps on June 14, 1942, at the age of 17.(4) Jack E. Chambers was stationed in Australia, New Zealand, New Guinea and Guam.(5) Jack E. Chambers achieved the rank of Corporal, Third Amphibian Tractor Battalion, Third Amphibious Corps, 12345678910111213141516171819 Fleet Marine Force.(6) On July 21, 1944, while in command of an Amphibian Tractor crew during the landing of assault troops on Guam, and observing two troop-loaded tractors incapacitated by shells from an enemy mortar concentration on the reef, Jack E. Chambers without hesitation braved a hail of withering mortar fire and led his crew to the incapacitated tractors, courageously removed the troops from the wreckage and returned them to the beach, where he was subsequently killed by hostile fire.(7) Jack E. Chambers was 20 years old, and for his dedicated service received the Bronze Star, Purple Heart, World War II Victory Medal and various service medals.(8) Jack E. Chambers is buried at the National Cemetery of the Pacific, Honolulu, Hawaii.(9) Sheldon L. Chambers was born November 16, 1920, in Altoona.(10) Sheldon L. Chambers was the son of Oscar and Sarah Chambers and had five brothers, Leroy, Reginald, Robert, Russell and Charles, and three sisters, Verna, Audrey and Janet.(11) Sheldon L. Chambers attended Altoona High School, graduating in 1939.(12) Sheldon L. Chambers enlisted in the United States Army Air Force in June 1939 following graduation from high school.(13) Sheldon L. Chambers served as a Flight Officer/Co-Pilot in the United States Army Air Force, 308th Bomber Group, Heavy, 425th Bomber Squadron.(14) On January 25, 1944, Sheldon L. Chambers was on the 20250HB1570PN1859 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 crew of the B-24J Liberator #42-73308, nicknamed "Hot as Hell," when the crew took off from Kunming Airfield in China during a routine flight to Chabua Airfield in India, where the crew was reported missing with no trace and officially declared dead on January 26, 1946.(15) On December 7, 2006, the wreck of "Hot as Hell" was located in Damrah, Arunchal Pradesh State, India by Clayton Kuhles.(16) For his dedicated service, Sheldon L. Chambers was awarded the Air Medal, Purple Heart, United States Aviator Badge Army, World War II Victory Medal, American Campaign Medal, Army Presidential Unit Citation, Army Good Conduct Medal and Asiatic-Pacific Campaign Medal.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Keys 5599/5600, carrying Interstate 99 over Pennsylvania Route 36 in Logan Township, Blair County, is designated as the Jack E. and Sheldon L. Chambers Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1570PN1859 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122